Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-8712
Patient safety work product; unlawful use; effect.

Any reference to, or offer into evidence in the presence of the jury or other factfinder or admission into evidence of, patient safety work product during any proceeding contrary to the Patient Safety Improvement Act shall constitute grounds for a mistrial or a similar termination of the proceeding and reversible error on appeal from any judgment or order entered in favor of any party who discloses or offers into evidence patient safety work product in violation of the act.

Laws 2005, LB 361, § 12.